Florida, session 2026, HB147.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1012.591, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1012.591 Oath of classroom teachers.—Before entering upon
the duties of a classroom teacher, as defined in s.
1012.01(2)(a), each person employed as a classroom teacher shall
subscribe to the following oath: "I do solemnly swear (or
affirm) that I will support, protect, and defend the
Constitution and Government of the United States and the
Constitution and Government of the State of Florida; that I am
duly qualified for employment as a classroom teacher in this
state; that I will well and faithfully perform the duties of a
classroom teacher in a professional, independent, objective, and
nonpartisan manner; that I will uphold the highest standards of
academic integrity and professional ethics; that I will foster a
respectful learning environment for all students, which promotes
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb147-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 147 2026
critical thinking, civic responsibility, and lifelong learning;
and that I will serve as a positive role model in both conduct
and character, so help me God."
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb147-00